Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3220
Material noncompliance; referral to board.

An appraisal management company that has a reasonable basis to believe that an AMC appraiser has failed to comply with applicable laws or the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice shall refer the matter to the board if the failure to comply is material.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB989, § 10.